vale/styles/config/dictionaries/en_US-grafana.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '
NOSUGGEST !

PFX d Y 1
PFX d   0     de         .

PFX u Y 1
PFX u   0     un         .

PFX m Y 1
PFX m   0     mis        .

PFX p Y 1
PFX p   0     pre        .

SFX A Y 2
SFX A   e     able       e
SFX A   0     able       .

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX D   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX G Y 2
SFX G   e     ing        e
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]

SFX M Y 2
SFX M   0     '          s
SFX M   0     's         [^s]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y
SFX N   0     en         [^ey]

SFX R Y 2
SFX R   0     r          e
SFX R   0     ed         .

SFX S Y 5
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          ph
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]
