vale/styles/config/dictionaries/en_US-grafana.dic
367
ACL/S po:noun
ADOT/ po:noun
AI Observability/ po:noun
Adaptive Metrics/ po:noun
Aerospike/ po:noun
after/ po:preposition
Agent/ po:noun
Alertmanager/MS po:noun
allowlist/DGS po:verb
allowlist/S po:noun
Alloy/ po:noun
anonymize/DGS po:verb
Ansible/ po:adjective
Ansible/ po:noun
Apdex/ po:noun
API/S po:noun
APT/ po:noun
ARN/ po:noun
Asserts/ po:noun
autoscale/DGS po:verb
autoscaler/S po:noun
AWS/ po:noun
AWS Distro for OpenTelemetry Collector/ po:noun
AWS X-Ray/ po:noun
backend/S po:noun
backport/DGS po:verb
Beyla/ po:noun
blackbox/ po:noun
blocklist/DGS po:verb
blocklist/S po:noun
blockquote/S po:noun
Bollinger/ po:noun
boolean/ po:noun
BoringCrypto/ po:noun
BPF/ po:noun
Brotli/ po:noun
burndown/ po:adjective
bundler/S po:noun
cAdvisor/M po:noun
callee/S po:noun
CDN/ po:noun
CentOS/ po:noun
checkbox/S po:noun
CLA/ po:noun
clear/S po:verb
CLI/ po:noun
clickjack/DSG po:noun
CloudWatch/ po:noun
CLS/ po:noun
CMS/ po:noun
codespace/S po:noun
Codespaces/ po:noun
comment/S po:noun
comment/uDG po:verb
composable/ po:adjective
configure/mpDS po:verb
contentful/ po:adjective
CORS/ po:noun
Couchbase/M po:noun
CPU/S po:noun
CRD/S po:noun
cron/ po:noun
CSS/ po:noun
CSV/S po:noun
CVE/S po:noun
data center/S po:noun
data source/S po:noun
datagrid/S po:noun
dataset/S po:noun
Data Firehose/ po:noun
Databricks/ po:noun
Datadog/ po:adjective
Datadog/ po:noun
deliverable/S po:noun
disaggregate/DS po:verb
distroless/ po:adjective
DNS/ po:noun
DOM/ po:noun
don'ts/ po:noun
downsample/DG po:verb
drilldown/ po:noun
drill down/ po:verb
duplicate/dDSN po:noun
Dynatrace/ po:noun
passwordless/ po:adjective
eBPF/ po:noun
EKS/ po:noun
Elastic Kubernetes Service/ po:noun
email/ po:noun
enablement/ po:noun
enqueue/DS po:verb
Entra/ po:noun
ESLint/M po:noun
etcd/ po:noun
FAQ/S po:noun
Fargate/M po:noun
FCP/ po:noun
FID/ po:noun
Figma/ po:noun
filename/S po:noun
Firehose/M po:noun
firewall rules/ po:noun
FreeBSD/ po:noun
frontend/S po:noun
GEM/ po:noun
geomap/S po:noun
geospatial/ po:adjective
GKE/ po:noun
Git/ po:noun
GitHub/ po:noun
GitLab/ po:noun
glob/G po:noun
globbing/ po:verb
GNU/ po:noun
Goldmark/ po:noun
goroutine/S po:noun
GPG/ po:noun
GPU/S po:noun
Grafana/ po:adjective
Grafana/ po:noun
Gravatar/ po:adjective
Gravatar/ po:noun
Graylog/ po:noun
GUI/S po:noun
Gunicorn/ po:noun
Gzip/ po:noun
Hashicorp/ po:noun
hashmod/ po:noun
heatmap/S po:noun
hostname/S po:noun
HPA/S po:noun
HTML/ po:noun
HTTP/ po:noun
HTTPS/ po:noun
IBM/ po:noun
ICU/ po:noun
IDE/S po:noun
inclusivity/ po:noun
InfluxDB/ po:noun
ingester/MS po:noun
inode/s po:noun
Istio/ po:noun
Jaeger/ po:adjective
Jaeger/ po:noun
JAR/ po:noun
JavaScript/ po:noun
Jira/ po:noun
JMESPath/ po:noun
JMeter/M po:noun
journald/ po:noun
JPG/ po:noun
JSON/ po:noun
Jsonnet/ po:noun
JSX/ po:noun
JUnit/M po:noun
KEDA/M po:noun
keepalive/ po:noun
Kibana/ po:noun
Killercoda/ po:noun
Kinesis/ po:noun
Kotlin/ po:noun
KPI/S po:noun
KQL/ po:noun
Kprobe/S po:noun
kubelet/ po:noun
Kubernetes/ po:noun
Kubernetes Engine/ po:noun
Kusto/ po:noun
Kustomize/ po:noun
LangChain/ po:noun
launchd/ po:noun
LCP/ po:noun
LESS/ po:noun
LLM/S po:noun
Linode/M po:noun
LogQL/ po:noun
Logs Drilldown/ po:noun
Loki/ po:noun
lookup/S po:noun
loopback/ po:noun
Lucene/ po:noun
manage/uD po:verb
Markdown/ po:noun
marshal/u po:verb
matcher/S po:noun
media type/S po:noun
memberlist/ po:noun
Memcached/ po:noun
metadata/ po:noun
Metrics Drilldown/ po:noun
Mesos/ po:noun
middleware/S po:noun
Mimir/M po:noun
misconfiguration/S po:noun
mixin/S po:noun
Moodle/ po:noun
MySQL/ po:noun
namespace/S po:noun
NAT/ po:noun
nginx/ po:noun
Netlink/ po:noun
OAuth/ po:noun
Okta/ po:noun
onboard/DG po:verb
OnCall/ po:noun
OpenAI/ po:noun
open source/ po:noun
OpenShift/ po:noun
OpenTelemetry/ po:adjective
OpenTelemetry/ po:noun
Opsgenie/ po:noun
OSS/ po:noun
OTel/ po:adjective
OTel/ po:noun
OTLP/ po:noun
overbill/DG po:verb
overutilization/S po:noun
PagerDuty/ po:noun
Parca/ po:noun
path/S po:noun
PDF/S po:noun
performant/ po:adjective
Phlare/M po:noun
PHP/ po:noun
Pinecone/ po:noun
PLZ/S po:noun
PNG/ po:noun
Podman/ po:noun
Postgres/ po:noun
PostgreSQL/ po:noun
pprof/ po:noun
profile/DGRS po:verb
Profiles Drilldown/ po:noun
Prometheus/ po:noun
Promtail/ po:noun
PromQL/ po:noun
provision/dDG po:verb
proxy/DG po:verb
Puppetfile/S po:noun
PVC/S po:noun
Pyroscope/ po:noun
quantile/S po:noun
querier/MS po:noun
query/ po:noun
query/DGS po:verb
queryable/ po:adjective
queryless/ po:adjective
RAM/ po:noun
RBAC/ po:noun
RCA workbench/ po:noun
RDS/ po:noun
Relational Database Service/ po:noun
reachability/ po:noun
React/ po:noun
RED/ po:noun
redirection/S po:noun
Redis/ po:noun
register/dG po:verb
register/uD po:adjective
regular expression/s po:noun
repository/S po:noun
retry/DGS po:verb
retryable/ po:adjective
REPL/ po:noun
RHEL/ po:noun
rollout/S po:noun
Rollup/ po:noun
RPM/ po:noun
RSA/ po:noun
RudderStack/ po:noun
runbook/S po:noun
sandbox/DG po:verb
scheduler/MS po:noun
SCM/ po:noun
SCSS/ po:noun
SDK/S po:noun
semver/ po:noun
Sensu/ po:noun
Sensu Go/ po:noun
SEO/ po:noun
serverless/ po:adjective
SHA-1/ po:noun
shard/DG po:verb
shortcode/S po:noun
showback/S po:noun
siloed/ po:adjective
SLA/S po:noun
SLI/S po:noun
SLO/S po:noun
spanset/S po:noun
sparkline/S po:noun
Splunk/ po:adjective
Splunk/ po:noun
SQL/ po:noun
SQLite/ po:noun
SRE/S po:noun
SSD/S po:noun
SSM/ po:noun
SSH/ po:noun
SSL/ po:noun
SSO/ po:noun
stylesheet/S po:noun
subchart/S po:noun
submenu/S po:noun
subnet/S po:noun
subquery/S po:noun
subtask/S po:noun
SUSE/ po:noun
SUT/ po:noun
SVG/ po:noun
sync/DG po:verb
syntax/S po:noun
syslog/ po:noun
systemd/ po:noun
TCP/ po:noun
templated/ po:adjective
Tempo/ po:noun
Thanos/ po:noun
Threema/ po:noun
TLS/ po:noun
toolset/S po:noun
tooltip/S po:noun
tracepoint/S po:noun
TraceQL/ po:noun
traceroute/S po:noun
Traces Drilldown/ po:noun
triage/D po:verb
TSDB/S po:noun
TTL/S po:noun
UI/S po:noun
UID/S po:noun
uprobe/S po:noun
URI/S po:noun
URL/S po:noun
USB/ po:noun
UTC/ po:noun
UTF/ po:noun
UUID/S po:noun
UX/ po:noun
Velero/ po:noun
versus/ po:preposition
viewport/S po:noun
Vite/ po:noun
VM/S po:noun
VMware/ po:noun
VPC/S po:noun
VU/S po:noun
VUH/S po:noun
WAL/S po:noun
walkthrough/S po:noun
web/ po:noun
Webpack/ po:noun
webserver/S po:noun
Webex/ po:noun
Wi-Fi/ po:noun
WildFly/ po:noun
windows_exporter/S po:noun
worktree/ po:noun
XML/ po:noun
XSS/ po:noun
xy chart/S po:noun
YAML/ po:noun
YugabyteDB/ po:noun
ZIP/ po:noun
Zipkin/ po:adjective
Zipkin/ po:noun
zlib/ po:noun
